dargwa_numerals/dargwa.numerals.lexd
PATTERNS
Numbers [<num>:]
NumStemReg [<num>:] UnitsInfl
NumStemReg [<num>:] TensInfl (TensExactInfl) | (TensInexactInfl)
NumStemTen [<num>:] (TenExactInfl) | (TenInexactInfl)
NumStemTwenty [<num>:] (TwentyExactInfl) | (TwentyInexactInfl)
NumStemReg [<num>:] HundredsInfl (HundredsExactInfl) | (HundredsInexactInfl)
NumStemHundred [<num>:] (HundredExactInfl) | (HundredInexactInfl)
NumStemThousand [<num>:] (ThousandExactInfl) | (ThousandInexactInfl)
HigherNum [<num>:]

LEXICON NumStemReg
ца # один
кIи # два
хIяб # три
ав # четыре
шу # пять
урег # шесть
верхI # семь
гехI # восемь
урчIем # девять

LEXICON Numbers
ца:ца # один
кIиел:кIи # два
хIябал:хIяб # три
авал:ав # четыре
шел:шу # пять
урегал:урег # шесть
верхIел:верхI # семь
гехIел:гехI # восемь
урчIемал:урчIем # девять

LEXICON NumStemTen
вецI # десять

LEXICON NumStemTwenty
гъ # двадцать

LEXICON NumStemHundred
дарш # сто

LEXICON NumStemThousand
азир # тысяча

LEXICON HigherNum
миллион # миллион
миллиард # миллиард

LEXICON UnitsInfl
<units>:ра

LEXICON TensInfl
<tens>:цI

LEXICON TensExactInfl
<exact>:али

LEXICON TensInexactInfl
<inexact>:анну

LEXICON TenExactInfl
<exact>:ал

LEXICON TenInexactInfl
<inexact>:ну

LEXICON TwentyExactInfl
<exact>:ал

LEXICON TwentyInexactInfl
<inexact>:ану

LEXICON HundredsInfl
<hundreds>:дарш

LEXICON HundredsExactInfl
<exact>:

LEXICON HundredsInexactInfl
<inexact>:лим

LEXICON HundredExactInfl
<exact>:ал

LEXICON HundredInexactInfl
<inexact>:лим

LEXICON ThousandExactInfl
<exact>:

LEXICON ThousandInexactInfl
<inexact>:лим
